District of Columbia statutes.
38-471

Transfer of Public Schools Realty Office to the Office of Public Education Facilities.

(a)

All functions, authority, programs, positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the District of Columbia Public Schools Realty Office shall be transferred to the Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization by March 3, 2010.

(b)

All rules, orders, obligations, determinations, grants, contracts, licenses, and agreements of the District of Columbia Public Schools Realty Office transferred to the Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization under subsection (a) of this section shall continue in effect according to their terms until lawfully amended, repealed, or modified.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4151, 57 DCR 181

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4151 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4151 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 4150 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle P of title IV of the act may be cited as the “District of Columbia Public Schools Realty Office Transfer Act of 2009”.

Short Title